Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.332

Use of persons, money, or property for private gain.

(1) No school district employee may employ or use any person, money, or property under the employee's official control or direction, in his or her official custody, without authorization, for the private benefit or gain of the employee or another.

(2) This section does not prohibit the use of public resources to benefit others as part of the employee's official duties.

(3) Each school district board of directors may adopt policies providing exceptions to this section for occasional use of the employee, of de minimis cost and value, if the activity does not result in interference with the proper performance of public duties.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt disciplinary guidelines for violations of this section.

[ 2009 c 224 s 1.]